Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 137
TRANSITION PROVISIONS

Cross references:

(1) For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-121-401.

(2) For the provisions of articles 20 to 29 of this title, the "Colorado Nonprofit Corporation Act", prior to its repeal on July 1, 1998, see volume 2 of the 1997 Colorado Revised Statutes.

Section

PART 1 APPLICATION OF ACT

PART 2 ELECTION BY PRE-1968
CORPORATE ENTITIES

PART 3 SAVING PROVISIONS